West Virginia, session 2025, HB3461.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. PRIMARY ELECTIONS AND NOMINATING PROCEDURES. §3-5-6e. Election of judges of the Intermediate Court of Appeals. (a) The Legislature finds that representative democracy works best when the largest number of eligible voters participate in an election.  The Legislature also finds that far more eligible voters participate in general elections than primary elections.(b) An election for the purpose of electing a Judge or Judges of the Intermediate Court of Appeals shall be held on the same date as the primary general election, as provided by law, upon a nonpartisan ballot by division printed for this purpose.  (b) (c) In case of a tie vote under this section, §3-6-12 of this code controls in breaking the tie vote.